Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-6.5] Prohibition on smoking in and
around public housing; designated smoking areas. (a) Smoking shall be
prohibited in any public housing project, elder or elderly household, as
defined in section 356D-1, or state low-income housing project, as defined in
section 356D-51, within:

(1) Each individual housing unit;

(2) All common areas;

(3) Community facilities; and

(4) Twenty feet from each individual building of the
public housing project or state low-income housing project, and from any entrance,
exit, window, and ventilation intake that serves an enclosed or partially
enclosed area.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the
authority may designate one or more permissible smoking areas at least twenty
feet away from any residential or other building, or any greater distance away
as may ensure that the secondhand smoke does not infiltrate any dwelling unit.

(c) The authority shall place and maintain
"No smoking" signage at all entrances and exits of the property. The
authority may display additional "No smoking" signage at residential
and community facilities at their entrances and exits, offices, and in or at
enclosed, partially enclosed, or open common areas for the purpose of
conspicuous notice.

(d) The authority may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section:

"Common areas" means roofs, halls,
sidewalks, corridors, lobbies, stairs, stairways, fire escapes, entrances and
exits of the building or buildings, basements, yards, gardens, recreational
facilities, parking areas, storage spaces, and other parts of the project or
household normally in common use or other areas designated by the authority.

"Smoking" means inhaling, exhaling,
burning, or carrying any lighted or heated tobacco product or plant product
intended for inhalation in any manner or in any form. [L 2014, c 91, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next